apertium-nn-nb.nb.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!-- 

    Generated semi-automatically from the Norsk ordbank.
    http://www.edd.uio.no/prosjekt/ordbanken/

    Grep for "todo" if you're looking for work.

    Licence: GPL only

  -->
<dictionary>
	<alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZÆØÅabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzæøåcqwxzCQWXZéèêóòâôÉÊÈÓÔÒÂáàÁÀäÄöÖ</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/> 
		<sdef n="np" 	c="Proper noun"/> 
		<sdef n="top"   c="Toponym"/>
		<sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/> 
		<sdef n="ref" 	c="Reflexive pronoun"/> 
		<sdef n="res" 	c="Resiprocal pronoun"/> 
		<sdef n="det" 	c="Determiner"/> 
		<sdef n="pos" 	c="Possessive"/> 
		<sdef n="p1" 	c="1st person"/> 
		<sdef n="p2" 	c="2nd person"/> 
		<sdef n="p3" 	c="3rd person"/> 
		<sdef n="nt" 	c="Neuter"/> 
		<sdef n="mf" 	c="Masculine / feminine, also utrum in nouns"/> 
		<sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine"/> 
		<sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine"/> 
		<sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular / plural"/> 
		<sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/> 
		<sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural"/> 
		<sdef n="ind" 	c="Indefinite"/> 
		<sdef n="def" 	c="Definite"/> 
		<sdef n="nom" 	c="Nominative"/> 
		<sdef n="acc" 	c="Accusative"/> <!-- the oblique case -->
		<sdef n="gen" 	c="Genitive"/>  
		<sdef n="dem" 	c="Demonstrative"/> 
		<sdef n="itg" 	c="Question word / interrogative"/>
		<sdef n="qnt" 	c="Quantifier"/> 
		<sdef n="neg" 	c="Negative"/> 
		<sdef n="emph" 	c="Emphatic"/> 
		<sdef n="vblex" 	c="Verb"/> 
		<sdef n="pstv" 	c="-s verb"/>
		<sdef n="inf" 	c="Infinitive"/> 
		<sdef n="pres" 	c="Present"/> 
		<sdef n="imp" 	c="Imperative"/> 
		<sdef n="pret" 	c="Preterite"/> 
		<sdef n="pass" 	c="Passive"/> 
		<sdef n="pp" 	c="Perfect participle"/> 
		<sdef n="pprs" 	c="Present participle (adjectival)"/>
		<sdef n="pr" 	c="Preposition"/> 
                <sdef n="ij" 	c="Interjection"/>
		<sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb"/> 
		<sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective"/> 
		<sdef n="part" 	c="Participle (infinitive)"/> 
		<sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="Subordinating conjunction"/> 
		<sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/> 
		<sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="Adverbial conjunction"/> 
		<sdef n="posi" 	c="Positive"/>
		<sdef n="comp" 	c="Comparative"/> 
		<sdef n="sup" 	c="Superlative"/> 
		<sdef n="num" 	c="Numeral"/>
		<sdef n="ord" 	c="Ordinal"/> 
		<sdef n="acr" 	c="Acronym"/> 
		<sdef n="sent" 	c="Sentence end"/> 
		<sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/> 
		<sdef n="clb" 	c="Possible clause boundary"/>
		<sdef n="overskrift" 	c="Headline"/>
		<sdef n="apos" 	c="Apostrophe"/> 
		<sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis"/> 
		<sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis"/>

		<sdef n="compound-only-L" 	c="May only be the left-side of a compound"/> 
		<sdef n="compound-R" 	c="May be the right-side of a compound, or a full word"/> 
		<sdef n="ep-Ø" 	c="no epenthesis"/>
		<sdef n="ep-s" 	c="s-epenthesis"/> 
		<sdef n="ep-e" 	c="e-epenthesis"/> 
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>
          <!-- Compounding pardefs. -->
<pardef n="cp-R"> 
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
 </pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both-s">
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="ep-Ø"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e> 
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="ep-s"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e> 
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both-s_S__case">
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="ep-Ø"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e> 
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="ep-s"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e> 
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cp-both-s_'__case">
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="ep-Ø"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e> 
   <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="ep-s"/><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e> 
   <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
   <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Genitive case endings for nouns, determiners  -->
<pardef n="S__case">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="'s__case">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'s</l>        <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="'__case">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>'</l>         <r><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<!-- Radical vs conservative spelling choices -->
<pardef n="lek_LR_leik" c="ikkje_feleleik_eller_dugleik">
  <e>                    <p><l>lek</l> <r>lek</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">             <p><l>leik</l><r>lek</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="mel_LR_mjøl" c="og melk/mjølk">
  <e>                    <p><l>mel</l> <r>mel</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">             <p><l>mjøl</l><r>mel</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hvete_LR_kveite">
  <e>                    <p><l>hvete</l> <r>hvete</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">             <p><l>kveite</l><r>hvete</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="grøt_LR_graut">
  <e>                    <p><l>grøt</l> <r>grøt</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">             <p><l>graut</l><r>grøt</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hånd_LR_hand">
  <e>                    <p><l>hånd</l><r>hånd</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">             <p><l>hand</l><r>hånd</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="hval_LR_kval">
  <e>                    <p><l>hval</l><r>hval</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">             <p><l>kval</l><r>hval</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="høy_LR_høg">
  <e>                    <p><l>høy</l><r>høy</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">             <p><l>høg</l><r>høy</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="høye_LR_høg">
  <e>                    <p><l>høye</l><r>høye</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">             <p><l>høg</l> <r>høye</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sør_LR_syd">
  <e>                    <p><l>sør</l><r>sør</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">             <p><l>syd</l> <r>sør</r></p></e>
  <e r="RL">             <p><l>syd</l> <r>syd</r></p></e>
</pardef>


    <!-- Punctuation -->
<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <!-- separate out the number 1 as singular (fortunately "1.00" is usually plural!) -->
  <e>       <re>1</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[02-9]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9][.,][0-9]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="separa">
  <e>       <p><l>..</l><r>..<s n="sent"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>...</l><r>...<s n="sent"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aposchar">
  <e>       <i>'</i></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cometa">
  <e>       <par n="aposchar"/><p><l></l><r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- <pardef n="overskrift"> -->
<!--   <e>       <re> -->

<!-- </re><p><l></l><r><s n="clb"/><s n="overskrift"/></r></p></e> -->
<!-- </pardef> -->

<pardef n="%/s__n">
  <!-- for po-file translations and Giza++: -->
  <e>       <re>_[0-9a-z]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/></r></p></e>
  <!-- %s doesn't work in Apertium yet. Bug TODO -->
<!--   <e>       <re>%[0-9a-z]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/></r></p></e> -->
</pardef>

<e lm="sørover">         <par n="sør_LR_syd"/><i>over</i><par n="i__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sørøst">          <par n="sør_LR_syd"/><i>øst</i><par n="i__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sørvestover">     <par n="sør_LR_syd"/><i>vestover</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="håndhelse">	 <par n="hånd_LR_hand"/><i>hels</i><par n="an/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="håndhilse">	 <par n="hånd_LR_hand"/><i>hils</i><par n="an/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="sørvest">         <par n="sør_LR_syd"/><i>vest</i><par n="ost__n"/></e>
<e lm="høysete"> <par n="høy_LR_høg"/><i>set</i><par n="ød/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="høygir"> <par n="høy_LR_høg"/><i>gir</i><par n="ul__n"/></e>
<e lm="høyblad"> <par n="høy_LR_høg"/><i>blad</i><par n="ja__n"/></e>
<e lm="høystatusyrke"> <par n="høy_LR_høg"/><i>statusyrk</i><par n="ød/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="folkehøyskole">   <i>folke</i><par n="høy_LR_høg"/><i>skole</i><par n="re__n"/></e>
<e lm="høyesterett"> <par n="høye_LR_høg"/><i>sterett</i><par n="ep__n"/></e>
<e lm="høyesterettsadvokat"> <par n="høye_LR_høg"/><i>sterettsadvokat</i><par n="ep__n"/></e>
<e lm="høyesterettsjustitiarius"> <par n="høye_LR_høg"/><i>sterettsjustitiari</i><par n="dekan/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blekansikt"><i>b</i><par n="lek_LR_leik"/><i>ansikt</i><par n="ja__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bleking"><i>b</i><par n="lek_LR_leik"/><i>ing</i><par n="då__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frotterhåndkle"><i>frotter</i><par n="hånd_LR_hand"/><i>kl</i><par n="åkl/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grøt"><par n="grøt_LR_graut"/><par n="ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gryngrøt"><i>gryn</i><par n="grøt_LR_graut"/><par n="ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grynmel"><i>gryn</i><par n="mel_LR_mjøl"/><par n="ul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gråhval"><i>grå</i><par n="hval_LR_kval"/><par n="ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="håndkjøp"><par n="hånd_LR_hand"/><i>kjøp</i><par n="ul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kortlek"><i>kort</i><par n="lek_LR_leik"/><par n="ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kunsthåndverk"><i>kunst</i><par n="hånd_LR_hand"/><i>verk</i><par n="ul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hval"><par n="hval_LR_kval"/><par n="ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hvalkjøtt"><par n="hval_LR_kval"/><i>kjøtt</i><par n="ul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hvetebrød"><par n="hvete_LR_kveite"/><i>brød</i><par n="ul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hvetebrødsdag"><par n="hvete_LR_kveite"/><i>brødsdag</i><par n="ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hvetegrøpp"><par n="hvete_LR_kveite"/><i>grøpp</i><par n="ul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hvetekli"><par n="hvete_LR_kveite"/><i>kli</i><par n="ul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hvetekorn"><par n="hvete_LR_kveite"/><i>korn</i><par n="ul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hvetemel"><par n="hvete_LR_kveite"/><par n="mel_LR_mjøl"/><par n="ul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lekekamerat"><par n="lek_LR_leik"/><i>ekamerat</i><par n="ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maisgrøt"><i>mais</i><par n="grøt_LR_graut"/><par n="ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="melkebil"><par n="mel_LR_mjøl"/><i>kebil</i><par n="ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="melkemat"><par n="mel_LR_mjøl"/><i>kemat</i><par n="ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="melkesyrebakterie"><par n="mel_LR_mjøl"/><i>kesyrebakterie</i><par n="re__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pantelek"><i>pante</i><par n="lek_LR_leik"/><par n="ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="polentamel"><i>polenta</i><par n="mel_LR_mjøl"/><par n="ul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="retthval"><i>rett</i><par n="hval_LR_kval"/><par n="ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rømmegrøt"><i>rømme</i><par n="grøt_LR_graut"/><par n="ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skifermel"><i>skifer</i><par n="mel_LR_mjøl"/><par n="ul__n"/></e>
    <e lm="smørgrøt"><i>smør</i><par n="grøt_LR_graut"/><par n="ep__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sørsame"><par n="sør_LR_syd"/><i>same</i><par n="re__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vågehval"><i>våge</i><par n="hval_LR_kval"/><par n="ep__n"/></e>
<e lm="hundelek"><i>hundelek</i><par n="lek_LR_leik"/><par n="ep__n"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="cometa"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
   <e>                      <par n="overskrift"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="%/s__n"/></e>
